Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Adjudication

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For article, “Aldo Leopold and Western Water Law: Thinking Perpendicular to the Prior Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-4-301.
Streams to be first adjudicated.

The method of determining the priority and amounts of appropriation to be as follows: the board of control shall decide at their first meeting, the streams to be first adjudicated, and shall fix a time for the beginning of taking of testimony, and the making of such examination as will enable them to determine the rights of the various claimants.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 860; C.S. 1910, § 764; C.S. 1920, § 885; R.S. 1931, § 122-104; C.S. 1945, § 71-204; W.S. 1957, § 41-165.

Cross references. —

As to rights to foreign water, see §§

41-3-201

through

41-3-215

. See also §

41-4-206

as to duties of board at first meeting. As to adjudication of water rights with reference to diversion or storage of water for use in adjoining state by board, see §

41-4-104

. For duties of state board of control as to adjudication generally, see §

41-4-206

. As to tabulations and supplements of adjudicated water rights, see §§

41-4-208

through

41-4-210

. As to proceedings upon appeal from decisions of board of control with reference to water rights, see §§

41-4-401

through

41-4-408

.

Stated

in

Wyoming v. United States, 933 F. Supp. 1030, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11526 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article “Rights of Wyoming Appropriators in Underground Water,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 111.

For article, “Priority and Progress — Case Studies in the Transfer of Water Rights,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1966).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

§ 41-4-302.
Notice; by publication; contents; taking of testimony; adjournment of hearings generally.

The said board shall prepare a notice, setting forth the date when the engineer will begin a measurement of the stream, and the ditches diverting the water therefrom, and a place, and a day certain, when the superintendent of the water division in which the stream to be adjudicated is situated, shall begin the taking of testimony as to the rights of the parties claiming water therefrom. Said notice shall be published in two (2) issues of a newspaper having general circulation in the county in which such stream is situated, the publication of said notice to be at least thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of taking testimony by said division superintendent, or for the measurement of the stream by the state engineer, or his assistant; and the superintendent taking such testimony shall have the power to adjourn the taking of evidence from time to time, and from place to place; provided, all places appointed and adjourned to by the superintendent shall be so situated, as related to the streams, as shall best suit the proper convenience of the persons interested in the determination of such priorities and appropriations.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 861; C.S. 1910, § 765; C.S. 1920, § 886; R.S. 1931, § 122-105; C.S. 1945, § 71-205; W.S. 1957, § 41-166.

§ 41-4-303.
Notice; by mail to claimants.

It shall also be the duty of said division superintendent to mail to each party having a recorded claim to waters of said stream, by registered mail, a similar notice setting forth the date when the state engineer, or his assistant, will begin the examination of the stream and ditches diverting water therefrom, and also the date when the superintendent will begin the taking of testimony, and the date when the taking of such testimony by said division superintendent shall close.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 862; C.S. 1910, § 767; C.S. 1920, § 888; R.S. 1931, § 122-107; C.S. 1945, § 71-206; W.S. 1957, § 41-167.

Notice required prior to adjudication. —

In action to quiet title to water right, notice of adjudication of Big Laramie river having been appropriately given, evidence of which was offered by plaintiff, evidence was sufficient to show that board of control has jurisdiction to adjudicate rights in that stream, and thus giving defendants, and all similarly situated, prima facie right to water therefrom adjudicated to them, and hence also showing their interest in controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Opportunity to present claims. —

Original appropriators, predecessors of plaintiffs, having been afforded full opportunity to present their claims for adjudication of water rights, were not deprived of any constitutional right, and plaintiffs are in no better position. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Due process. —

Under this section, service of notice by registered letter in the United States mail is sufficient service to constitute due process of law. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

Effect of pleadings. —

In action to quiet title to water rights, claimed by prescription in Little Laramie River, answer setting up defense of decrees by board of control in Big Laramie River, admission by plaintiffs that board of control had initiated a proceeding and decreed rights in latter river and its tributaries, while denying all other allegations, effect is that decree itself only is questioned and fact that it is of a priority different in time and amount than averred is immaterial, defendant not being required to anticipate such attack at the trial. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Copy of decree as evidence. —

A copy of the record of the decree of adjudication, certified by the clerk of the board of control as a true and correct copy of original decree, is admissible in evidence. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Adjudications by the board of control are prima facie correct,

though not binding on persons not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

In action to quiet title to water right prescriptively claimed by plaintiffs in Little Laramie river, allegation in answer of defendant that board of control had adjudicated water right to predecessor of plaintiffs, which was admitted, carried with it presumption of appearance and also of regularity, hence all objections to pleadings must be overruled. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

If any tribunal has unlimited jurisdiction over a class of cases, it stands on the same footing as courts of general jurisdiction respecting presumptions of regularity, including the presumption that due notice was given. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In adjudication nearly 50 years ago, by state board of control, of water rights on Little Laramie River, though failing to recite that notice was given interested parties, when the attack is collateral, it will be presumed that adjudication was after appearance, whether with or without notice being immaterial. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

In re Water Rights in Big Laramie River, 27 Wyo. 88, 192 P. 680,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1920).

§ 41-4-304.
Notice; all claimants to be notified.

In issuing notices to claimants in priority adjudications of the waters of any stream and its tributaries, as provided in W.S.

41-4-305

, all parties named in claiming the waters of said stream or tributaries in said transcript shall be notified by mail.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 33; R.S. 1899, § 886; C.S. 1910, § 791; C.S. 1920, § 912; R.S. 1931, § 122-131; C.S. 1945, § 71-237; W.S. 1957, § 41-168.

§ 41-4-305.
Notice; enclosure of form for statement by claimant; contents.

Said division superintendent shall, in addition, enclose with said notice a blank form on which said claimant shall present in writing all the particulars showing the amounts and dates of appropriations to the use of water of said stream to which he lays claim; the said statement to include the following:

The name and post office address of the claimant;

The nature of the use on which the claim for appropriation is based;

The time of the commencement of such use, and if distributing works are required;

The date of beginning of the survey;

The date of beginning of construction;

The date when completed;

The date of beginning and completion of enlargements;

The dimensions of the ditch as originally constructed and as enlarged;

The date when water was first used for irrigation or other beneficial purposes, and if used for irrigation, the amount of land reclaimed the first year; the amount in subsequent years, with the dates of reclamation, and the amount of land such ditch is capable of irrigating;

The character of the soil and the kind of crops cultivated and such other facts as will show a compliance with the law in acquiring the appropriation and the rank of priority claimed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 863; C.S. 1910, § 768; C.S. 1920, § 889; R.S. 1931, § 122-108; C.S. 1945, § 71-207; W.S. 1957, § 41-169.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Constitutionality. —

Provisions herein are constitutional. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

Adjudications by the board of control are prima facie correct,

though not binding on persons not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Adjudication of water shares. —

In absence of claims or proofs by landowners, decree adjudicating company's right to two appropriations of stated number of cubic feet of water per second from river for irrigation of specified acreage of land did not adjudicate equal proportionate shares of water to each piece of land designated. State v. Laramie Rivers Co., 59 Wyo. 9, 136 P.2d 487,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1943).

Laches. —

Doctrine of laches applies to an attack of abandonment of a water right, whether of a completed appropriation or of a gradual development proceeding with reasonable diligence, statute of nonuser applying, with possible exceptions, only to a perfected right under a permit and not to an inchoate right, since state engineer has right to extend or to cancel a permit, and there is no enactment applicable to irrigation projects under construction, but not completed, at time of enactment of §

41-4-506

in 1890. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 41-4-306.
Notice; statements to be under oath; administering.

Each of said claimants shall be required to certify to his statements under oath, and the superintendent of the water division in which the testimony is taken is hereby authorized to administer such oaths, which shall be done without charge to the claimant, as also shall be the furnishing of blank forms for said statement.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 864; C.S. 1910, § 769; C.S. 1920, § 890; R.S. 1931, § 122-109; C.S. 1945, § 71-208; W.S. 1957, § 41-170.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

Adjudications by board. —

Adjudications by the board of control are presumed to be correct and prima facie evidence thereof even on parties who were not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

§ 41-4-307.
Notice; payment of printing costs.

All bills for the printing of notices to claimants of water in the adjudications provided for in this act shall be paid for by the secretary of the state board of control.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 39; R.S. 1899, § 969; C.S. 1910, § 766; C.S. 1920, § 887; R.S. 1931, § 122-106; C.S. 1945, § 71-252; W.S. 1957, § 41-171; 2017 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “secretary of the state board of control” for “county in which the stream, the appropriation of whose waters shall have been so adjudicated, shall be situated, the said bills to be approved by the superintendent of the water division in which the adjudication is made.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” refer to ch. 8, Laws 1890-91. See note to §

41-3-501

.

§ 41-4-308.
Taking of testimony generally; taking of proof.

Upon the date named in the notice provided for in the preceding sections, the division superintendent shall begin the taking of testimony and shall continue until the testimony shall be completed; provided, that in case the division superintendent of any water division is directly or indirectly interested in the water of any stream of his division, or is prevented by illness or other disability from the taking of the proofs, the taking of evidence so far as relates to the stream shall be under the direction of the division superintendent of the next nearest water division or under the direct personal supervision of the state engineer, as may be deemed by the engineer the most expedient. Provided, that in the taking of proofs of appropriation of water made under a permit issued by the state engineer, the permits having been issued subsequent to the adjudication of the waters of the stream from which the appropriation is made, the superintendent may, in his discretion, authorize the water commissioner of the district in which the appropriation is made to take the proofs. Upon the taking of the proofs so ordered the water commissioner shall at once forward them to the division superintendent. The water commissioner shall take no proofs except those specifically ordered by the division superintendent. Provided that in the taking of proofs of appropriation of water made under a permit issued by the state engineer subsequent to the adjudication of the water of the stream from which the appropriation is made, the superintendent may, in his discretion authorize the water commissioner of the district in which the appropriation is made to take the proofs. Upon the taking of the proofs so ordered the water commissioner shall at once forward them to the division superintendent. The water commissioner shall take no proofs except those specifically ordered by the division superintendent.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 865; Laws 1901, ch. 87, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 770; C.S. 1920, § 891; R.S. 1931, § 122-110; C.S. 1945, § 71-209; W.S. 1957, § 41-172; Laws 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision on final proof of appropriation, see §

41-4-511

.

Cited

in

Laramie Irrigation Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1932).

§ 41-4-309.
Notice on completion of testimony; inspection of evidence.

Upon the completion of the taking of evidence by the division superintendent, it shall be his duty to at once give notice, in one (1) issue of some newspaper of general circulation in the county where such determination is, and by registered mail to the various claimants, that upon a certain day, and a place named in the notice, all of said evidence shall be open to the inspection of the various claimants, and said superintendent shall keep said evidence open to inspection at said place, not less than one (1) day and not more than five (5) days.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 22; R.S. 1899, § 866; C.S. 1910, § 771; C.S. 1920, § 892; R.S. 1931, § 122-111; C.S. 1945, § 71-210; W.S. 1957, § 41-173.

Parol evidence. —

If admissible, parol evidence which would contradict written words “waste and seepage water” appearing on map accompanying application for permit to appropriate water must at least be clear and convincing. Binning v. Miller, 55 Wyo. 451, 102 P.2d 54,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1940).

Cited

in

Laramie Irrigation Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(1932).

§ 41-4-310.
Duty of claimants to appear; failure to comply; time limits for appearance; rights of claimant not notified of adjudication.

Whenever the state board of control shall, as provided by law, proceed to adjudicate and determine the rights of the various claimants to the use of water upon any stream or other body of water, it shall be the duty of all claimants interested in such stream or other body of water to appear and submit proof of their respective appropriations, at the time and in the manner required by law; and any such claimant who shall fail to appear in such proceedings and submit proof of his appropriations shall be barred and estopped from subsequently asserting any rights theretofore acquired upon the stream or other body of water embraced in such proceedings, and shall be held to have forfeited all rights to the use of said stream theretofore claimed by him. Provided, that any person claiming the right to the use of water of any stream heretofore adjudicated by the board of control who, having been or claiming to have been at the time an appropriator therefrom, shall have failed to appear and submit proof of his claim shall be permitted within one (1) year after the passage of this act, but not thereafter, to apply for a hearing and an adjudication of his rights in the manner hereinafter provided; and provided, further, that any claimant upon whom no other service shall be made than by publication in the newspaper, of the notice of such proceedings and taking of testimony, may, within one (1) year after the entry of the order or decree of the board, determining the rights of the various claimants upon any particular stream or other body of water, have the same opened and be let in to give proof of his appropriation; but before the decree of the board can be opened in such case, the applicant shall give notice to all other persons interested in the water of the stream or other body of water in question, and shall with his petition file the same kind of proof as required of claimants in original hearings and make it appear to the satisfaction of the board that during the pendency of the proceedings he had no actual notice thereof in time to appear and make proof of his claim; and all parties interested may present affidavits as to the matter of actual notice of the applicant.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 67, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 794; C.S. 1920, § 915; R.S. 1931, § 122-136; C.S. 1945, § 71-259; W.S. 1957, § 41-174.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 67, Laws 1901, was repealed by § 19, ch. 86, Laws 1907.

Purpose of this section

is to make clear that the adjudication of a water right in favor of a claimant shall be final and binding, and that no further rights may be claimed by him over and above the award made in the adjudication. Petition for Change in Use & for Change in Place of Use for Ekxtrom No. 1 Well, etc. v. State Bd. of Control, 649 P.2d 657,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1982).

Purpose and scope of section. —

This section was enacted as state policy to establish certainty as the foundational basis of justice in administration of water rights, and requiring all to thereunder submit proof within one year, and it clearly holds that plaintiffs have a water right, as to priority and amount, as awarded by board of control, and no other or greater. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Jurisdiction of board. —

In action to quiet title to water right, notice of adjudication of Big Laramie river having been appropriately given, evidence of which was offered by plaintiff, was sufficient to show that board of control had jurisdiction to adjudicate rights in that stream, thus giving defendants and all similarly situated prima facie right to water therefrom adjudicated to them, and hence also showing their interest in controversy. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

General rules concerning necessary or proper parties apply. —

While this section speaks of the necessity for “all claimants interested in such stream” to appear and submit proof, no fixed standards concerning necessary or proper parties are actually set forth, and under such circumstances, general rules are usually applicable. Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

Owners must be made parties if certificates are to be issued in their names. —

In order to issue certificates in the names of the record owners of the land, the board is duty bound to see that the owners are properly made parties to the proceeding. Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

The board is without authority to name a person an appropriator in its order or certificate, even though that person is an owner of an interest in the subject property, when it has failed to have him named as a party to the proceeding. Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

Presumption that notice given. —

If any tribunal has unlimited jurisdiction over a class of cases, it stands on same footing as courts of general jurisdiction respecting presumptions of regularity, including presumption that due notice was given. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Where recital appears in water adjudication decree, by state board of control, that due notice had been given to interested parties, presumption will be indulged in favor of such inferior tribunal as obtains with respect of courts of general jurisdiction to show jurisdiction of parties. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Original appropriators, predecessors of plaintiffs, having been afforded full opportunity to present their claims for adjudication of water rights were not deprived of any constitutional right, and plaintiffs are in no better position. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Presumption that appearance made. —

Where adjudication, by state board of control, of water rights on Little Laramie river, though failing to recite that notice was given interested parties, was had nearly 50 years ago, and courts indulge presumptions the more readily when proceedings are ancient, when the attack is collateral, and when it is admitted that decree adjudicated rights in favor of plaintiffs' predecessors in interest, it must be presumed it was after appearance. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

In action to quiet title to water right prescriptively claimed by plaintiffs in Little Laramie river, allegation in defendant's answer that board of control had adjudicated a water right to predecessor of plaintiff, which was admitted, carried with it presumption of appearance and also of regularity, and all objections to pleadings must be overruled. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Presumption that adjudication correct. —

In action to quiet title to water rights, independently of scope of §

41-4-311

, plaintiffs pleaded prescriptive right thereto in the Little Laramie watershed, to which defendants answered, in part setting up decrees of predecessor of plaintiff, and, not being denied, presumption of correctness of these decrees arose, making further pleading or proof of correctness unnecessary. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Adjudications by board of control were prima facie correct, though not binding on persons not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Jurisdiction of courts. —

Jurisdiction of court, in matters of water adjudication, is, aside from appeals, confined to determining rights in individual cases, to the extent that the board of control has not acted. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Requirements for prescriptive title. —

Testimony and findings of the court examined failed to show prescriptive right in plaintiffs adverse to defendants, for possession to ripen into prescriptive title must be actual, hostile, exclusive, and continuous for period prescribed by statute. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

No prescriptive rights to water. —

Since 1890 when water rights were required to be initiated by permit from state engineer, it is settled that prescriptive right to state waters cannot obtain. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Water right by prescription being impossible up to adjudication in Little Laramie river in 1892, and it being impossible for the appropriators to change their claim to priority as to time and amount in their particular tributary stream, they will not be better enabled to take a different course because their dispute is with appropriators direct from the main stream. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Showing of interest necessary to attack another's right. —

Before a party may attack right of another, either on constitutional or other grounds, he must show an interest which is affected, or a right invaded, which cannot obtain where plaintiff enjoys a decreed water right which cannot be enlarged. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Enlargement of rights. —

This section estops water users under decrees of state board of control from claiming any other or greater rights than thereunder, hence in a suit to obtain enlarged rights not only the testimony offered but that admitted, in support of the petition, was immaterial and had no tendency to establish any rights in the plaintiff. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Questioning decree. —

In action to quiet title to water rights, claimed by prescription, in Little Laramie river, answer sets up defense of decrees by board of control, in Big Laramie river, and admission was made by plaintiffs that the board of control had initiated proceeding and decreed rights in latter river and its tributaries, while denying all other allegations, decree itself only is questioned and fact that it is of a priority different in time and amount than averred was immaterial, defendant not being required to anticipate such attack at the trial. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Copy of record admissible. —

In suit to quiet title to water rights, a copy of record of the decree of adjudication, certified by the clerk of the board of control as true and correct copy of original decree, is admissible. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Photostatic copies of pen and ink records of decrees in the board of control, showing nothing more suspicious than interlineations, will not prevent their admission as evidence, when properly certified, especially as they are what is called ancient documents. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Fact that certified copy of judicial proceeding omits signature of judge to the record will not render the copy inadmissible, especially if signature of judge was not necessary to validity of original record, there being no statute requiring the record of board of control to be signed by any officer. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Laches. —

Where suits to quiet title to water rights in Little Laramie river were started in 1932 attacking appropriation claimed by defendants under an adjudication by board of control in 1903, attack upon at least largest part of defendant's appropriation was barred by laches. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Stated

in

Big Goose & Beaver Ditch Co. v. Wallop, 382 P.2d 388,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1963).